Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.800

Business license system—Certain business or professional activity licenses exempt.

Except as provided in RCW 43.07.200, the provisions of this chapter regarding the processing of license applications and renewals under the business licensing system do not apply to those business or professional activities that are licensed or regulated under chapter 31.04, 31.12, or 31.13 RCW or under Title *30, 32, 33, or 48 RCW.

[ 2013 c 144 s 29; 2011 c 298 s 10; 2000 c 171 s 44; 1982 c 182 s 17.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Title 30 RCW was recodified and/or repealed pursuant to 2014 c 37, effective January 5, 2015.

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.